Ohio, session 136, HB157.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 3333.47 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 3333.47. (A) As used in this section, "qualifying institution" means either of the following: (1) A state institution of higher education, as defined in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code; (2) A private nonprofit institution of higher education that holds a certificate of authorization pursuant to Chapter 1713. of the Revised Code. (B) The chancellor of higher education shall establish and administer the hunger-free campus grant program and designation. The chancellor shall establish forms and procedures for qualifying institutions to apply to participate in the program, including to apply for a hunger-free campus designation and grants under the program. The chancellor shall determine how often a participating institution must reapply to maintain its designation. (C) The chancellor shall determine the criteria to award a hunger-free campus designation to a qualifying institution, which may include the following: (1) Having an established on-campus food pantry or a partnership with a local food bank to provide regular, on-campus food distributions; (2) Providing information to students on the supplemental nutrition assistance program, medicaid, and other programs that reduce food insecurity; (3) Having an established emergency assistance grant that is available to students; (4) Having an established student meal plan credit donation program. (D) The chancellor shall develop a logo that institutions that have earned the hunger-free campus designation may display. An institution that has not earned the hunger-free campus designation under this section shall not display the logo created under this division. (E) Under the program, the chancellor shall develop a method to determine the amount of a grant to be awarded to qualifying institutions who apply for grants. The chancellor shall award initial grants to qualifying institutions that have not earned the hunger-free campus designation and demonstrate a need for funding to meet the designation requirements. The chancellor shall award sustaining grants to qualifying institutions that have earned the hunger-free campus designation so that the institutions may leverage existing basic needs infrastructure; maximize federal programs; build strategic partnerships at the local, state, and national levels to address food insecurity among students; raise awareness on available resources to address basic food needs; and support the reduction of student food insecurity in other ways, all as approved by the chancellor. The chancellor shall give preference to applications from qualifying institutions with the highest percentage of enrolled students eligible for the federal Pell grant. However, the chancellor has discretion to give preference to applications that demonstrate that an institution's plan for the grant will have a greater impact on students experiencing food insecurity than another applicant with a higher percentage of students eligible for the federal Pell grant. (F) The chancellor may adopt any rules necessary to implement the provisions of this section. (G) The chancellor shall allow grant recipients to use grant funds flexibly to implement the goals of the program, including giving recipients the ability to do all of the following: (1) Support emergency assistance; (2) Hire staff to manage initiatives related to the program; (3) Use grant funds for operational activities related to the program. (H) No grant recipient shall reduce its existing funding designated for initiatives that address food insecurity with the goal or net effect of shifting the cost burden of those initiatives to the hunger-free campus grant program. (I) A qualifying institution that receives a grant under this section shall report to the chancellor information on how the grant is used and its effects on food security on the institution's campus after each academic year that the institution receives the grant. The institution also shall report to the chancellor its progress on working toward a hunger-free campus designation. (J) Notwithstanding any provision of section 121.95 of the Revised Code to the contrary, a regulatory restriction contained in a rule adopted under this section is not subject to sections 121.95 to 121.953 of the Revised Code. Section 2. (A) Not later than the thirty-first day of December two years after the establishment of the Hunger-Free Campus Grant Program under section 3333.47 of the Revised Code, the Chancellor of Higher Education shall prepare a report on the grant program that compiles the reports submitted by each institution of higher education that received a Hunger-Free Campus Grant under the program. (B) The Chancellor shall submit the report to the Governor and, in accordance with section 101.68 of the Revised Code, the General Assembly. Section 3. All items in this act are hereby appropriated as designated out of any moneys in the state treasury to the credit of the designated fund. For all operating appropriations made in this act, those in the first column are for fiscal year 2026 and those in the second column are for fiscal year 2027. The operating appropriations made in this act are in addition to any other operating appropriations made for these fiscal years. Section 4. 1 2 3 4 5 A BOR DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER EDUCATION B General Revenue Fund C GRF 235498 Hunger-Free Campus Grant Program $625,000 $625,000 D TOTAL GRF General Revenue Fund $625,000 $625,000 E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $625,000 $625,000 HUNGER-FREE CAMPUS GRANT PROGRAM The foregoing appropriation item 235498, Hunger-Free Campus Grant Program, shall be used by the Chancellor of Higher Education to support the Hunger-Free Campus Grant Program and hunger-free campus designations pursuant to section 3333.47 of the Revised Code. Section 5. Within the limits set forth in this act, the Director of Budget and Management shall establish accounts indicating the source and amount of funds for each appropriation made in this act, and shall determine the manner in which appropriation accounts shall be maintained. Expenditures from operating appropriations contained in this act shall be accounted for as though made in, and are subject to all applicable provisions of, the main operating appropriations act of the 136th General Assembly. Section 6. This act shall be known as the Hunger-Free Campus Act.